Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 1. Salaries.

Sec. 39.20.010.
Annual salary of governor.

The annual salary of the governor shall be in accordance with AS 39.23.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 53 SLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 53 SLA 2005.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 1965; am § 4 ch 101 SLA 1969; am § 4 ch 193 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 34 SLA 1974; am § 7 ch 148 SLA 1976; am § 9 ch 263 SLA 1976; am §§ 6, 21 ch 3 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 2 TSSLA 2000; am §§ 1, 7 ch 53 SLA 2005; am § 6 ch 21 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under secs. 26 and 28(2),
ch. 21, SLA 2008, the amendment to this section made by sec. 6,
ch. 21, SLA 2008, took effect July 1, 2009, which was the effective date of the provision of
ch. 12, SLA 2009 that fully funded the salary recommendation of the State Officers Compensation Commission dated January 10, 2009.

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 7, 275-294, 433-438.

67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 374 et seq.

Sec. 39.20.020.
Date of entitlement of governor’s salary.

The governor is entitled to receive the salary established for the office effective from the date on which the oath of office is taken by the governor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 39 SLA 1959)

Sec. 39.20.030.
Annual salary of lieutenant governor.

The annual salary of the lieutenant governor shall be in accordance with AS 39.23.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 53 SLA 2005.]

[Repealed, § 7 ch 53 SLA 2005.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 115 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1967; am § 5 ch 101 SLA 1969; am § 5 ch 193 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 34 SLA 1974; am § 8 ch 148 SLA 1976; am § 10 ch 263 SLA 1976; am §§ 7, 22 ch 3 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 2 TSSLA 2000; am §§ 2, 7 ch 53 SLA 2005; am § 7 ch 21 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under secs. 26 and 28(2),
ch. 21, SLA 2008, the amendment to this section made by sec. 7,
ch. 21, SLA 2008, took effect July 1, 2009, which was the effective date of the provision of
ch. 12, SLA 2009 that fully funded the salary recommendation of the State Officers Compensation Commission dated January 10, 2009.

Sec. 39.20.040.
Date of entitlement of lieutenant governor’s salary.

The lieutenant governor is entitled to receive the salary established for the office effective from the date on which the oath of office is taken by the lieutenant governor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 40 SLA 1959)

Sec. 39.20.050.
Exclusive compensation.

The compensation fixed by law for the governor and lieutenant governor is in full for all services rendered by each of them in any official capacity or employment whatsoever during their respective terms of office, and shall be paid throughout their respective terms of office unless the office becomes vacant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 160 SLA 1960)

Sec. 39.20.060.
Exclusion of governor and lieutenant governor from personnel laws.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the governor and lieutenant governor are not considered employees of the state for the purpose of state personnel laws relating to hours of employment, annual leave, sick leave, overtime, compensatory time, and travel allowances. This section does not deprive the governor and lieutenant governor of the right to participate in the state retirement system or in state group insurance plans.

History.

(§ 2 ch 160 SLA 1960)

Sec. 39.20.070.
Subsequent legislation relating to AS 39.20.050 and 39.20.060.

AS

39.20.050

and

39.20.060

are not superseded or modified by any subsequent legislation except to the extent that the legislation does so expressly.

History.

(§ 3 ch 160 SLA 1960)

Sec. 39.20.080.
Salary of executive department head and deputy.

The monthly salary of the head of each principal executive department of the state shall be in accordance with AS 39.23.

The monthly salary of a deputy head of a principal executive department of the state is equal to a step in Range 28 of the salary schedule in AS

39.27.011

.

Except as provided by a general law applicable to all officers of the state, the compensation of the head of each principal executive department of the state may not be reduced during the executive’s tenure in office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 115 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 156 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 123 SLA 1967; am § 6 ch 101 SLA 1969; am § 6 ch 193 SLA 1970; am § 37 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 7 ch 34 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 205 SLA 1975; am § 9 ch 148 SLA 1976; am § 11 ch 263 SLA 1976; am §§ 8, 9, 15, 23, 24 ch 3 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 53 SLA 2005; am §§ 8, 9 ch 21 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under secs. 26 and 28(2),
ch. 21, SLA 2008, the amendment to this section made by sec. 8,
ch. 21, SLA 2008, took effect July 1, 2009, which was the effective date of the provision of
ch. 12, SLA 2009 that fully funded the salary recommendation of the State Officers Compensation Commission dated January 10, 2009.

Administrative Code. —

For pay, see 2 AAC 7, art. 8.

Editor’s notes. —

Chapter 205, SLA 1975, which amended this section, was submitted to the voters by referendum and was rejected.

Sec. 39.20.090.
Salaries and expenses.

The salaries and expenses of officers, boards, commissions, and bureaus established by the laws of the state shall be paid from appropriations made for that purpose, as other expenses of the state are paid.

History.

(§ 11-3-8 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 39.20.100.
Fees, mileage or compensation. [Repealed, § 75 ch 59 SLA 1982.]